District of Columbia statutes.
2-219.04

Reports.

The Mayor shall submit a semiannual report to the Council of the District of Columbia on January 31st and July 31st of each year. The report shall include, for each preceding 6-month period:

(1)

The number of government-assisted projects or contracts for which employment agreements were executed;

(2)

The number of jobs that result from employment agreements;

(3)

The number of District residents actually employed in government-assisted projects or contracts; and

(4)

The number of names of unemployed District residents on the First Source Register.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-93, § 5, 31 DCR 2545
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 5, 32 DCR 30
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-210, § 2(d), 40 DCR 19
Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-84, § 2(d), 58 DCR 11170
1981 Ed., § 1-1164.
D.C. Law 19-84 substituted “government-assisted project or contract” for “government-assisted project”.
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 5-93, see Mayor’s Order 86-66, April 22, 1986.